src/fst/affixes/nouns.lexc
! ============================= !
!! # Noun morphological lexica !
! ============================= !

! ===== !
! Nouns !
! ===== !

LEXICON Vocative   !!≈ * **@CODE@**
+Voc: # ;

LEXICON Noun1-IS_PTC-OM !!≈ * **@CODE@** is to provide deverbal nouns with +Der/ӧм tags
+V+Der/ӧм: N_ ;

LEXICON Noun1-IS_PTC-AN !!≈ * **@CODE@**
+V+Der/An: N_ ;

LEXICON Noun1-IS_PTC-YSJ !!≈ * **@CODE@**
+V+Der/ысь: N_ ;

LEXICON N-DOR ! мӧдладор The Russian is an adverbial phrase
+Der/дор: N_ ;

LEXICON N-VYV ! тулысвыв The Russian is an adverbial phrase
+Der/выв: N_ ;

LEXICON Noun1-F !
+Src/F: N_ ;

LEXICON Noun1-R-RY !
+Err/Orth:ь N_ ;  ! This deals with январь
           N_ ; ! This is the new proper spelling январ

LEXICON Noun1-SYT-STY !
+Err/Orth:ть N_ ;  ! This deals with гӧсть
:ьт         N_ ; ! This is the new proper spelling гӧсьт

!LEXICON N_RU-ӦЙ
!+Use/SpellNoSugg:ӧй N_ ;


!! Basic nouns.

!! The lexicon for basic nouns is N_ 


LEXICON N-ANIM_   
+Sem/Ani: N_ ;

LEXICON N-INAN_   
+Sem/Inanim: N_ ;

LEXICON N_   
+Der/Ок+Der/Dimin+N:%>ок NMN_ ;
: NMN_ ;
LEXICON N_ok   
+Dim: NMN_ ;

LEXICON N_err/orth
+Err/Orth: NMN_ ;

LEXICON N_voc
+Voc: # ;
LEXICON N_2 !Komi ethnic name
: NMN_ ;
LEXICON N_2R1O6 !ethnic name, Nearly Russian Plus?
: NMN_ ;
LEXICON N2R1_ !ethnic name, Nearly Russian
: NMN_ ;
LEXICON N2R2_ !ethnic name, Russian made Komi-like
: NMN_ ;
LEXICON N1R2_ ! made Komi-like
: NMN_ ;
LEXICON N_dial !
: NMN_ ;

LEXICON Noun1 !! This should be phased out 2013-05-07
 N_ ;

LEXICON NMN_
+Cmp: R ;
+Sg: CASEPOSSLEX ;
+Pl:%>%^1Cnsэз CASEPOSSLEX ;
   PL-CASE-PX ;
LEXICON PL-CASE-PX
+Pl+Nom+PxSg2:%>%^1Cnsэт K ;
+Pl+Gen+PxSg2:%>%^1Cnsэтлӧн K ;
+Pl+Abl+PxSg2:%>%^1Cnsэтлісь K ;
+Pl+Dat+PxSg2:%>%^1Cnsэтлӧ K ;

+Pl+Acc+PxSg2:%>%^1Cnsэтӧ K ;
+Pl+Com+PxSg2:%>%^1Cnsэткӧт K ;
+Pl+Car+PxSg2+So/PC:%>%^1Cnsэттӧг K ;
+Pl+Cns+PxSg2:%>%^1Cnsэтла K ;
+Pl+Cmpr+PxSg2:%>%^1Cnsэтся K ;
+Pl+Ela+PxSg2:%>%^1Cnsэсит K ;
+Pl+Apr+PxSg2+So/PC:%>%^1Cnsэтлань K ;
+Pl+Egr+PxSg2+So/PC:%>%^1Cnsэтсянь K ;
+Pl+TerII+PxSg2:%>%^1Cnsэтви K ;
+Pl+AprEgr+PxSg2+So/PC:%>%^1Cnsэтланьсянь K ;
+Pl+AprPrl+PxSg2+So/PC:%>%^1Cnsэтланьӧт K ;
+Pl+AprTerI+PxSg2+So/PC:%>%^1Cnsэтланьӧдз K ;
+Pl+AprTerII+PxSg2:%>%^1Cnsэтланьви K ;

+Pl+Nom+PxSg3:%>%^1Cnsэс K ;
+Pl+Gen+PxSg3:%>%^1Cnsэслӧн K ;
+Pl+Abl+PxSg3:%>%^1Cnsэслісь K ;
+Pl+Dat+PxSg3:%>%^1Cnsэслӧ K ;

+Pl+Acc+PxSg3:%>%^1Cnsэсӧ K ;
+Pl+Com+PxSg3:%>%^1Cnsэскӧт K ;
+Pl+Car+PxSg3+So/PC:%>%^1Cnsэстӧг K ;
+Pl+Cns+PxSg3:%>%^1Cnsэсла K ;
+Pl+Cmpr+PxSg3:%>%^1Cnsэсся K ;
+Pl+Ela+PxSg3:%>%^1Cnsэсис K ;
+Pl+Apr+PxSg3+So/PC:%>%^1Cnsэслань K ;
+Pl+Egr+PxSg3+So/PC:%>%^1Cnsэссянь K ;
+Pl+TerII+PxSg3:%>%^1Cnsэсви K ;
+Pl+AprEgr+PxSg3+So/PC:%>%^1Cnsэсланьсянь K ;
+Pl+AprPrl+PxSg3+So/PC:%>%^1Cnsэсланьӧт K ;
+Pl+AprTerI+PxSg3+So/PC:%>%^1Cnsэсланьӧдз K ;
+Pl+AprTerII+PxSg3:%>%^1Cnsэсланьви K ;

+Pl+Ela+PxPl1:%>%^1Cnsэсиным K ;
+Pl+Ela+PxPl2:%>%^1Cnsэсиныт K ;
+Pl+Ela+PxPl3:%>%^1Cnsэсиныс K ;



!LEXICON Noun1-JM ! понйыс, понмыс 
!+Cmp:м R ;
!+Sg:м CASEPOSSLEX ;
!+Cmp:й R ;
!+Sg:й CASEPOSSLEX ;
!+Pl:%>%^1Cnsэз CASEPOSSLEX ;

!! subsequent Cns vs Vow
LEXICON N_PARAGOGIC-V/L !!= * @CODE@ ныв:ны нылыс
+Cmp:%^LVBound R ;
+Sg:%^LVBound CASEPOSSLEX-AFTERDERIVATION_CNS/END ;
+Sg: CASEPOSSLEX-AFTERDERIVATION_VOW ;
+Pl:%^LVBound%>%^1Cnsэз CASEPOSSLEX ;
:%^LVBound PL-CASE-PX ;

LEXICON N-INAN_PARAGOGIC-J 
+Sem/Inanim:  N_PARAGOGIC-J ;

LEXICON N_PARAGOGIC-J !!= * @CODE@ ав:ав авйыс
+Cmp: R ;
+Sg: CASEPOSSLEX-AFTERDERIVATION_CNS/END ;
+Sg:й CASEPOSSLEX-AFTERDERIVATION_VOW ;
+Pl:%>%^1Cnsэз CASEPOSSLEX ;
PL-CASE-PX ;

LEXICON N-INAN_PARAGOGIC-K
+Sem/Inanim:	N_PARAGOGIC-K ;
LEXICON N_PARAGOGIC-K !!= * @CODE@ кытш:кытш кытшкыс
+Cmp: R ;
+Sg: CASEPOSSLEX-AFTERDERIVATION_CNS/END ;
+Sg:к CASEPOSSLEX-AFTERDERIVATION_VOW ;
+Pl:%>%^1Cnsэз CASEPOSSLEX ;
PL-CASE-PX ;

LEXICON N_PARAGOGIC-M !!= * @CODE@ зон:зон зонмыс
+Cmp: R ;
+Sg: CASEPOSSLEX-AFTERDERIVATION_CNS/END ;
+Sg:м CASEPOSSLEX-AFTERDERIVATION_VOW ;
+Pl:%>%^1Cnsэз CASEPOSSLEX ;
PL-CASE-PX ;

LEXICON N_PARAGOGIC-T !!= * @CODE@ зеп:зеп зептыс
+Cmp: R ;
+Sg: CASEPOSSLEX-AFTERDERIVATION_CNS/END ;
+Sg:т CASEPOSSLEX-AFTERDERIVATION_VOW ;
+Pl:%>%^1Cnsэз CASEPOSSLEX ;
PL-CASE-PX ;

LEXICON N_END-IN-J !!= * @CODE@ абай:аба абайыс
+Cmp:й R ;
+Sg:й CASEPOSSLEX-AFTERDERIVATION_CNS/END ;
+Sg: CASEPOSSLEX-AFTERDERIVATION_Я ;
+Sg:й CASEPOSSLEX-AFTERDERIVATION_Ӧ ;
+Pl:й%>%^1Cnsэз CASEPOSSLEX ;
:й PL-CASE-PX ;

LEXICON N_END-IN-ДДЬ !!= * @CODE@ автомобиль:автомобил автомобильыс
+Cmp:ь R ;
+Sg:ь CASEPOSSLEX-AFTERDERIVATION_CNS/END ;
+Sg:д CASEPOSSLEX-AFTERDERIVATION_Я ;
+Sg:дь CASEPOSSLEX-AFTERDERIVATION_Ӧ ;
+Pl:%>%^1Cnsэз CASEPOSSLEX ; !!= * @CODE@ 2015-09-04 change to ь%>яс after xfst rules are removed
PL-CASE-PX ;

LEXICON N_END-IN-ДДЗ !!= * @CODE@ автомобиль:автомобил автомобильыс
+Cmp:з R ;
+Sg:з CASEPOSSLEX-AFTERDERIVATION_CNS/END ;
+Sg:дз CASEPOSSLEX-AFTERDERIVATION_VOW ;
+Pl:з%>%^1Cnsэз CASEPOSSLEX ;
:з PL-CASE-PX ;

LEXICON N_END-IN-ЛЛЬ !!= * @CODE@ моль:мол молльӧ
+Cmp:ь R ;
+Sg:ь CASEPOSSLEX-AFTERDERIVATION_CNS/END ;
+Sg:л CASEPOSSLEX-AFTERDERIVATION_Я ;
+Sg:ль CASEPOSSLEX-AFTERDERIVATION_Ӧ ;
+Pl:%>%^1Cnsэз CASEPOSSLEX ; !! 2015-09-04 change to ь%>яс after xfst rules are removed
PL-CASE-PX ;

LEXICON N_END-IN-Ч/ДЗ !!= * @CODE@ автомобиль:автомобил автомобильыс
: NMN_END-IN-Ч/ДЗ ;
LEXICON NMN_END-IN-Ч/ДЗ !!= * @CODE@ автомобиль:автомобил автомобильыс
+Cmp: R ;
+Sg: CASEPOSSLEX-AFTERDERIVATION_CNS/END ;
+Sg: CASEPOSSLEX-AFTERDERIVATION_VOW ;
+Pl:%>%^1Cnsэз CASEPOSSLEX ;
PL-CASE-PX ;

!LEXICON N_END-IN-Ь !!= * @CODE@ автомобиль:автомобил автомобильыс
!+Cmp:ь R ;
!+Sg:ь CASEPOSSLEX-AFTERDERIVATION_CNS/END ;
!+Sg: CASEPOSSLEX-AFTERDERIVATION_Я ;
!+Sg:ь CASEPOSSLEX-AFTERDERIVATION_Ӧ ;
!+Pl:%>%^1Cnsэз CASEPOSSLEX ; !! 2015-09-04 change to ь%>яс after xfst rules are removed



!LEXICON NounLA ! ӧтила
!N_ ; ! Difference betw N_ and NounLA still to be documented.

LEXICON NounMort
!N_ ; ! Difference betw N_ and NounMort still to be documented.
+Sg:% морт CASEPOSSLEX ;
!+Pl:% морт CASEPOSSLEX ;


LEXICON NounSG ! м орт
+Sg: CASEPOSSLEX ;

LEXICON NounPi ! пи These have a unique  pl marker ян.
+Sg: CASEPOSSLEX ;        
+Pl:%>ян CASEPOSSLEX ;    


!LEXICON Noun1-IS_ACRON ! А*С*СР ! АТП Note the inconcistencies in the star use.
!+ACR: ACRONDELIMITER ;

LEXICON NounPL ! бедьторъяс
+Pl: CASEPOSSLEX ; ! here, %>%^1Cnsэз is put as part of the stem
! Very many plural nouns do not have this tag. We could change яс-final
! nouns from N_ to NounPL, I guess.

!LEXICON NounPOSS ! чой niece, nephew
!N_ ; ! Declension to be determined.

LEXICON FIRST
+Cmp: # ;

!LEXICON ACRONDELIMITER
!    CASEPOSSLEX ;
!:%: CASEPOSSLEX ;
!:%- CASEPOSSLEX ;
!:%' CASEPOSSLEX ;


! =================== !
!! ## Inflectional lexica 
! =================== !


!! All nouns follow one contlex "N_"
!! to begin with here is simply a list of all variant
!! with no more variants beyond:

! Numbers
! Case + Poss or Poss+Case


LEXICON CASEPOSSLEX !!≈ * **@CODE@**

 DERIVEDADJ ;    ! Deriving prenominal adjectives, республикаса
CASEPOSSLEX-afterDerivation ;

LEXICON CASEPOSSLEX-afterDerivation
 CASEPOSSLEX-AFTERDERIVATION_CNS/END ;
  CASEPOSSLEX-AFTERDERIVATION_VOW ;
