src/fst/stems/nouns.lexc
LEXICON Nouns
ай+N+Sem/Ani:а N_END-IN-J  "(kpv)..ай+N:а.." ;
аркирей+N:аркире N_END-IN-J  "(kpv)..аркирей+N:аркире.." ;
туй+N:ту N_END-IN-J  "(kpv)..туй+N:ту.." ;
бабыв+N:бабыл N_PARAGOGIC-V/L ;
бикыв+N:бикыл N_PARAGOGIC-V/L ;
бордтыв+N:бордтыл N_PARAGOGIC-V/L ;
висьӧв+N:висьӧл N_PARAGOGIC-V/L ;
джоджув+N:джоджул N_PARAGOGIC-V/L ;
картов+N:картол N_PARAGOGIC-V/L ;
куру+N:куру N_ ;
кыров+N:кырол N_PARAGOGIC-V/L ;
кӧдзыв+Hom2+N:кӧдзыл N_PARAGOGIC-V/L ;
лукасов+N:лукасол N_PARAGOGIC-V/L ;
мампӧв+N:мампӧл N_PARAGOGIC-V/L ;
паськыв+N:паськыл N_PARAGOGIC-V/L ;
сой+N:со N_END-IN-J  "(kpv)..сой+N:со.." ;
угов+N:угол N_PARAGOGIC-V/L ;
чарньӧв+N:чарньӧл N_PARAGOGIC-V/L ;
шынньӧв+N:шынньӧл N_PARAGOGIC-V/L ;
юрвердiсь+N:юрвердiсь N_ ;
аргус+N:аргус Noun1-F ;
биоток+N:биоток Noun1-F ;
вера+N:вера Noun1-F ;
гантель+N:гантель Noun1-F ;
дратхаар+N:дратхаар Noun1-F ;
карамелька+N:карамелька Noun1-F ;
курай+N:курай Noun1-F ;
молотобоеч+N:молотобоеч Noun1-F ;
отвращеннё+N:отвращеннё Noun1-F ;
полонянка+N:полонянка Noun1-F ;
растворин+N:растворин Noun1-F ;
смычок+N:смычок Noun1-F ;
тоннелепровод+N:тоннелепровод Noun1-F ;
ходунки+N:ходунки Noun1-F ;
янтарка+N:янтарка Noun1-F ;
бумагаок+N:бумагаок N_ok ;
ваныр+N:ваныр N_ ;
воротаок+N:воротаок N_ok ;
вӧрпа+N:вӧрпа N_ ;
горбок+N:горбок N_ok ;
дзир+N:дзир N_ ;
добычаок+N:добычаок N_ok ;
жӧнишок+N:жӧнишок N_ok ;
инькаок+N:инькаок N_ok ;
йирсянін+N:йирсянін N_ ;
конечок+N:конечок N_ok ;
корпотас+N:корпотас N_ ;
кышок+N:кышок N_ok ;
кӧсперк+N:кӧсперк N_ ;
майӧжок+N:майӧжок N_ok ;
муягӧд+N:муягӧд N_ ;
орддян+N:орддян N_ ;
палачок+N:палачок N_ok ;
поньточок+N:поньточок N_ok ;
протокол+N:протокол N_ ;
сильканок+N:сильканок N_ok ;
соровтчан+N:соровтчан N_ ;
туисок+N:туисок N_ok ;
тшын+N:тшын N_ ;
чёртпиянок+N:чёртпиянок N_ok ;
чӧвтӧт+N:чӧвтӧт N_ ;
ёркӧток+N:ёркӧток N_ok ;
ӧбедня+N:ӧбедня N_ ;
англичана+N:англичана N2R1_ ;
прансуз+v1+N:прансуз N2R2_ ;
пелысь+N:пелыч N_err/orth ;
балтиеч+N:балтиеч N2R2_ ;
балтика-финн+N:балтика-финн N2R1_ ;
булгарин+N:булгарин N2R1_ ;
бухареч+N:бухареч N2R2_ ;
врангелеч+N:врангелеч N2R2_ ;
вымич+N:вымич N2R1_ ;
дази+N:дази N2R1_ ;
деголлевеч+N:деголлевеч N2R2_ ;
ижора+N:ижора N2R1_ ;
иранеч+N:иранеч N2R2_ ;
казашка+N:казашка N2R1_ ;
касимовеч+N:касимовеч N2R2_ ;
киевлянка+N:киевлянка N2R1_ ;
латин+N:латин N2R1_ ;
ливанеч+N:ливанеч N2R2_ ;
мандзей+N:мандзей N2R1_ ;
махновеч+N:махновеч N2R2_ ;
нижегородеч+N:нижегородеч N2R2_ ;
ойрот+N:ойрот N2R1_ ;
петлюровеч+N:петлюровеч N2R2_ ;
римлянин+N:римлянин N2R1_ ;
рязанеч+N:рязанеч N2R2_ ;
спартанеч+N:спартанеч N2R2_ ;
сюнну+N:сюнну N2R1_ ;
томилинеч+N:томилинеч N2R2_ ;
устьцилемцы+N:устьцилемцы N2R1_ ;
черногореч+N:черногореч N2R2_ ;
эжватас+N:эжватас N2R1_ ;
бичульки+N:бичульки N_dial ;
валёжник+N:валёжник N_dial ;
горда+N:горда N_dial ;
дӧчка+N:дӧчка N_dial ;
кабала+N:кабала N_dial ;
кольк+N:кольк N_dial ;
кӧспель+N:кӧспель N_dial ;
места+N:места N_dial ;
оконча+N:оконча N_dial ;
понкачка+N:понкачка N_dial ;
своячина+N:своячина N_dial ;
сьӧктанник+N:сьӧктанник N_dial ;
чӧнӧр+N:чӧнӧр N_dial ;
ӧсина+N:ӧсина N_dial ;
вооруженнё+N:вооруженнё N1R2_ ;
догадь+N:догадь N1R2_ ;
зараженнё+N:зараженнё N1R2_ ;
исследованнё+N:исследованнё N1R2_ ;
купальнича+N:купальнича N1R2_ ;
наводненнё+N:наводненнё N1R2_ ;
обществоведеннё+N:обществоведеннё N1R2_ ;
отраженнё+N:отраженнё N1R2_ ;
поколеннё+N:поколеннё N1R2_ ;
преступленнё+N:преступленнё N1R2_ ;
раденнё+N:раденнё N1R2_ ;
сечанка+N:сечанка N1R2_ ;
состояннё+N:состояннё N1R2_ ;
ткачика+N:ткачика N1R2_ ;
языкознаннё+N:языкознаннё N1R2_ ;
ваиньӧй+N:ваиньӧй N_voc ;
воніньӧй+N:воніньӧй N_voc ;
вӧр-ваиньӧй+N:вӧр-ваиньӧй N_voc ;
гӧсиньӧй+N:гӧсиньӧй N_voc ;
зону+N:зону N_voc ;
крайиньӧй+N:крайиньӧй N_voc ;
кыліньӧй+N:кыліньӧй N_voc ;
маму+N:маму N_voc ;
мырсьӧминьӧй+N:мырсьӧминьӧй N_voc ;
пуиньӧй+N:пуиньӧй N_voc ;
старикиньӧй+N:старикиньӧй N_voc ;
сьӧлӧмшӧриньӧй+N:сьӧлӧмшӧриньӧй N_voc ;
тӧліньӧй+N:тӧліньӧй N_voc ;
ыбиньӧй+N:ыбиньӧй N_voc ;
ёртіньӧй+N:ёртіньӧй N_voc ;
адыг+N:адыг N_2R1O6 ;
бандерлог+N:бандерлог N_2R1O6 ;
бенедиктинеч+N:бенедиктинеч N_2R1O6 ;
будетляна+N:будетляна N_2R1O6 ;
гурьёвчи+N:гурьёвчи N_2R1O6 ;
донбассовеч+N:донбассовеч N_2R1O6 ;
итальяночка+N:итальяночка N_2R1O6 ;
каталонеч+N:каталонеч N_2R1O6 ;
колорадо+N:колорадо N_2R1O6 ;
масаи+N:масаи N_2R1O6 ;
нанаеч+N:нанаеч N_2R1O6 ;
панфиловеч+N:панфиловеч N_2R1O6 ;
приднестровеч+N:приднестровеч N_2R1O6 ;
северянин+N:северянин N_2R1O6 ;
фламандеч+N:фламандеч N_2R1O6 ;
гайнса+N:гайнса N_2 ;
зюздинса+N:зюздинса N_2 ;
иньвинса+N:иньвинса N_2 ;
коми-зюзьдинса+N:коми-зюзьдинса N_2 ;
косинса+N:косинса N_2 ;
кочёвса+N:кочёвса N_2 ;
кувинса+N:кувинса N_2 ;
кудымкарса+N:кудымкарса N_2 ;
ленинградса+N:ленинградса N_2 ;
налимашорчи+N:налимашорчи N_2 ;
перковса+N:перковса N_2 ;
подлиповса+N:подлиповса N_2 ;
самковса+N:самковса N_2 ;
финно-угр+N:финно-угр N_2 ;
ягӧдинса+N:ягӧдинса N_2 ;
